Arkansas, session 2025, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES – SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Commerce for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.
Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC002 ACOM SECRETARY OF COMMERCE 1 GRADE SE05
(2) G329C CHIEF WORKFORCE OFFICER 1 GRADE SE04
(3) N263N COMMERCE CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE03
(4) A152C ACOM CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SE01
(5) G330C ACOM CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL II 1 GRADE SE01
(6) D150C ACOM CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT12
(7) D002N STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR LEAD 1 GRADE IT11
*MAH011*
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(8) D001C STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE IT09
(9) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(10) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(11) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(12) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(13) N084N ACOM AEDC MRKT & COMM. DIR 1 GRADE GS15
(14) N066N ACOM CHIEF COMM & LEG. AFFAIRS 2 GRADE GS14
(15 A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS12
(16) G026N ACOM AEDC ASSISTANT DIR. MGMT SVS 1 GRADE GS12
(17) G030N ACOM AEDC ASST DIR OF STEM EDUCATION 1 GRADE GS12
(18) P007N ACOM DWS DIR. OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS12
(19) P078C ACOM ARS DIR. OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS12
(20) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE GS12
(21) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(22) A040C ACOM ADFA FISCAL PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(23) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(24) X009C ACOM INSURANCE DEPT DIR OF SEC. OPS 1 GRADE GS10
(25) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(26) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(28) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 4 GRADE GS08
(29) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(30) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(31) C114C ACOM EXECUTIVE ASST TO SECRETARY 1 GRADE GS07
(32) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(33) G148C ENERGY PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(34) G163C ACOM REHAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(35) G181C ACOM DWS PROGRAM MONITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(36) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS07
(37) A080C ACOM FINANCE AUTHORITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(38) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(39) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(40) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 5 GRADE GS06
(41) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(42) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(43) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 59

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,400,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,502,564
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 200,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,802,564

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS WINE PRODUCERS COUNCIL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for miscellaneous grants and expenses of
the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Wine Producers Council for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS WINE PRODUCERS COUNCIL $5,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS WINE TOURISM FACILITY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Tourism Development Trust Fund, for land acquisition, construction, lease,
equipment acquisition, improvements, renovation, major maintenance, personal
services, maintenance and operating expenses associated with the wine tourism
facility in Franklin County, Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30,
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS WINE TOURISM FACILITY
EXPENSES $1,250,000

SECTION 5. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U055U ACOM AEDC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U063U ACOM CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE SE01
(3) N214N ACOM AEDC EXEC VP GLOBAL BUSINESS 1 GRADE SE01
(4) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(5) N062N ACOM AEDC BUSINESS DEV DIV DIR 1 GRADE GS15
(6) N061N ACOM AEDC BUSINESS FINANCE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(7) N225N ACOM AEDC EXEC VP & GEN COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(8) N085N ACOM AEDC DIR TECH & ENTREPRENEURSHIP 1 GRADE GS14
(9) G294C ACOM AEDC SENIOR COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(10) N059N ACOM AEDC TRAINING DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(11) B139C ACOM AEDC DIRECTOR OF EPSCOR 2 GRADE GS13
(12) B140C ACOM AEDC MANUFACTURING SOLUTIONS DIR 1 GRADE GS13
(13) N196N MILITARY AFFAIRS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(14) G034N ACOM AEDC ASST DIR SALES AND MARKETING 1 GRADE GS12
(15) G245C ACOM AEDC DIR COMMUNITY DEV & IMPROVE 1 GRADE GS12
(16) G014C ACOM AEDC DIR OF COMMUNITY DEV 1 GRADE GS12
(17) B018N ACOM AEDC FIELD ENGINEER 3 GRADE GS12
(18) G035N ACOM AEDC SALES AND MARKETING SPEC 1 GRADE GS12
(19) G273C ACOM AEDC SENIOR PROJECT CONSULTANT 4 GRADE GS12
(20) G015C ACOM AEDC SMALL/MINORITY BUSINESS DIR 1 GRADE GS12
(21) U099U ACOM DIRECTOR OF RURAL SERVICES 1 GRADE GS12
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(22) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(23) B016C ACOM AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR EPSCOR 1 GRADE GS11
(24) P076C ACOM AEDC DIGITAL MARKETING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(25) G062C ACOM AEDC PROJECT CONSULTANT 26 GRADE GS11
(26) G048C ACOM AEDC STRATEGIC PLAN ASST DIR 1 GRADE GS11
(27) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(28) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(29) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(30) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(31) G126C FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(32) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(33) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(34) NG159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(35) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(36) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(37) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(38) R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(39) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(40) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(41) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 6 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 70

SECTION 6. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: seven (7) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission Fund Account, for personal services,
operating expenses, grants and aid, and state matching funds of the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission - State
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,967,320
(02) EXTRA HELP 50,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,366,101
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,450,650
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 141,486
(C) PROF. FEES 1,765,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) ECONOMIC INFRASTRUCTURE/REGIONALISM
GRANTS 877,588
(06) GLOBAL BUSINESS INITIATIVES 900,000
(07) MILITARY AFFAIRS GRANT PROGRAM 750,000
(08) INDUSTRY TRAINING PROGRAM 1,714,800
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,982,945

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE (CDBG) - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Community Assistance
(CDBG) - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $382,165
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 136,675
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 60,600
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 70,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS/AIDS - CDBG 48,261,988
(05) STORM RECOVERY GRANTS 7,579,614
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $56,516,042

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CDBG DISASTER RECOVERY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development
Commission, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for addressing long term recovery and
restoration of infrastructure, housing and economic revitalization in the
most impacted and distressed areas of the State for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CDBG DISASTER RECOVERY $8,933,441

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS ACCELERATION FUND. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Arkansas Acceleration Fund, for grants and incentives to accelerate the
economy of the State through technology and knowledge-based development of
of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission -
Arkansas Acceleration Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ACCELERATION GRANTS & INCENTIVES $5,000,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - SUPER PROJECTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Economic
Development Superprojects Project Fund, for Super Projects as defined by
Amendment 82 to the Arkansas Constitution of the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Super Projects for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SUPER PROJECTS $6,000,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - NEW MARKETS PERFORMANCE PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
New Markets Performance Guarantee Fund, for refunds and reimbursements of
performance program application fees of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas
Economic Development Commission - New Markets Performance Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $142,266

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - QUICK ACTION CLOSING FUND. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Economic
Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund, for incentives to attract
new business and economic development to the State by the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Quick Action Closing
Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) QUICK ACTION CLOSING GRANTS $75,000,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY - STATE
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to
be payable from the Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account,
for personal services, operating expenses and grants and aid by the Division
of Science and Technology of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic
Development Commission - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $393,695
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 147,361
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS & AID - ARKANSAS RESEARCH MATCH 1,092,653
(05) TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT 156,975
(06) SEED CAPITAL INVESTMENTS 292,653
(07) ARKANSAS ACCELERATION FUND PROGRAM 11,600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $13,683,337

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY - SEED
CAPITAL INVESTMENT - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Commerce, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for investments in
technology based businesses by the Division of Science and Technology of the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Seed
Capital Investment - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INVESTMENTS $1,040,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - RURAL SERVICES DIVISION - STATE OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account, for personal
services, operating expenses and grants and aid by the Department of Commerce
- Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Rural Services Division - State
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $154,934
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 63,022
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 72,038
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,100
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS & AID -RURAL COMMUNITY GRANTS 500,000
(06) RURAL FIRE PROTECTION GRANTS 900,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,696,094

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - RURAL SERVICES DIVISION - CONFERENCE CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for conference expenses of the Rural Services
Division of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development
Commission - Conference Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONFERENCE EXPENSES $150,000

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION -
RURAL SERVICES - FISH AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION EDUCATION PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for grants and operating expenses for the Fish and
Wildlife Conservation Education Program by the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) FISH AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION
EDUCATION GRANTS AND AID 800,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $850,000

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - MINORITY AND WOMEN-OWNED BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE LOAN MOBILIZATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission, to be
payable from the Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization
Revolving Fund, for promotion and development of minority and women-owned
business enterprises in the state, increasing the ability of minority and
women-owned business enterprises to compete for state contracts, and
sustaining the economic growth of minority and women-owned businesses for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MINORITY & WOMEN-OWNED BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE MOBILIZATION LOAN $500,000

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - RURAL SERVICES DIVISION - LAW ENFORCEMENT
GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Rural Services Division, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for grants to law enforcement agencies
and associations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES $5,000,000

04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY - EPSCOR
- FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Division of Science and
Technology, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for strengthening research and education in
science and engineering in Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $252,663
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 135,519
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 254,080
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 305,735
(C) PROF. FEES 447,470
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS AND AID - RESEARCH & EDUCATION 5,000,000
(05) INDIRECT FACILITIES AND ADMIN 34,502
(06) EXTERNAL EVALUATORS 400,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,829,969

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE - PAYROLL
REBATE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the Economic Development Incentive Fund for financial incentives
to companies locating a new facility or expanding an existing facility with
the State of Arkansas for companies that hire and maintain specified levels
of employment for the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development
Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID - PAYROLL REBATE $37,500,000


04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE - RECYCLE
TAX CREDIT. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Economic Development Commission, to be payable from the Economic
Development Incentive Fund to provide recycling tax credits in accordance
with Arkansas Code 26-51-506 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID - RECYCLING TAX CREDITS $42,000,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - RURAL SERVICES DIVISION - ANIMAL RESCUE AND
SHELTER GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce
- Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Rural Services Division, to be
payable from the Animal Rescue and Shelter Trust Fund, for grants to a county
or municipality based only on the infrastructure needs for animal rescues or
animal shelters for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ANIMAL RESCUE AND SHELTER GRANTS $50,000"

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - RURAL SERVICES DIVISION - COMMUNITY
ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission - Rural Services Division
- Community Assistance Grant Program, to be payable from the paying account
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for community
assistance grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM $10,000,000"

SECTION 26. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REALLOCATION OF RESOURCES - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE. Upon determination by the
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
Secretary of the Department of Commerce that a reallocation of resources for
purposes of reorganization or consolidation of administrative functions
within or between divisions is necessary for efficient and effective
operations of the department, the Secretary, with approval of the Governor
and prior approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee,
shall have the authority to request from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, a transfer of positions, appropriations, programs, and funds between
divisions or other budgetary units of the department. The transfers of
positions, programs, or activities shall be used for those purposes for which
the appropriations were approved by the General Assembly. Upon approval by
the Governor, the Secretary of the Department of Commerce shall request to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a transfer of positions, programs,
funds, appropriations, and/or line-item appropriations within or between
existing and newly created divisions, offices, sections and/or units. The
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then initiate the necessary transfer
documents to reflect transfers upon the fiscal records of the State
Treasurer, the State Auditor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and
Divisions of the Commerce Department. Provided, however, that the Secretary
shall be limited to submitting no more than two (2) individual transaction
transfer requests during any fiscal year.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Commerce may operate more efficiently
if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Commerce under the
Reallocation of Resources provisions herein. Therefore, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court jurisdiction, this entire
section is void.
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER PROVISION. As requested from time to time by the Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission, the Chief Fiscal Officer may
transfer on his books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the
State, the sum not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from
the Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account to the Minority and
Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization Revolving Fund, to provide funds for
the Minority and Women-Owned Business Enterprise Loan Mobilization
appropriation herein.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD – MINORITY AND WOMEN-OWNED BUSINESS LOAN MOBILIZATION REVOLVING FUND.
Any unexpended balance of funds for the Minority and Women-Owned Business
Enterprise Loan Mobilization appropriation which remain at the close of each
state fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next state fiscal year to
be used for the same intent and purposes as set forth in law.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 29. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION – STATE OPERATIONS. After receiving approval from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee, the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission is authorized to transfer appropriation from any line item
appropriation authorized in the State Operations Section of this Act to any
other line item authorized in the State Operations Section of this Act.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may operate
more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission authorizing broad powers under this
Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior review of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The
requirement of review by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is
not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of review by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 30. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FOREIGN
OFFICE OPERATIONS. The Arkansas Economic Development Commission is hereby
authorized to enter into contractual arrangements with private and/or public
companies, corporations, individuals or organizations for the purpose of
operating foreign offices which shall only (i) provide export trade
assistance to Arkansas-based businesses, (ii) facilitate the repatriation to
Arkansas manufacturing businesses operating overseas, and (iii) encourage
direct investment in Arkansas of foreign companies that are not state-owned
or controlled. Arkansas Code 15-4-210 shall not be deemed restrictive in its
language so as to preclude the use of standard Professional Services
Contracts for the operation of the foreign offices and/or payment of such
contracts from the special line items as established by legislative
appropriation for the operation of said foreign offices.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 31. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. RURAL
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
DEVELOPMENT. From the funds appropriated for Community Development Grants
within the Community Development Program in this Act for Community Assistance
(CDBG) - Federal, the Arkansas Economic Development Commission (AEDC) shall
allocate at least $500,000 per fiscal year to the Rural Development Set-Aside
from the annual Community Development Block Grant, as defined in AEDC's
Consolidated Plan filed with the federal Department of Housing and Urban
Development. Funds allocated to the Rural Development Set-Aside are to be
used exclusively for grants to rural communities as defined in the
Consolidated Plan.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 32. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. GRANT
REVIEW. The Arkansas Economic Development Commission (AEDC) shall review all
applications for grant funds and shall certify those applications eligible
for grant funds under AEDC and federal guidelines. The Rural Services
Division of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission alone shall
recommend which grant applications will be funded, and AEDC shall disburse
grant funds from the Rural Development Set-Aside to those applicants
receiving final approval by the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission. AEDC and the Rural Services Division of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall promulgate rules and
regulations governing the application for and disbursement of grant funds
from the Rural Development Set-Aside, and an annual report of the disposition
of these grant funds shall be made to the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 33. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION - COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE (CDBG) - FEDERAL. After receiving approval
from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, the Director of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission is authorized to transfer appropriation from
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
any line item appropriation authorized in the Community Assistance (CDBG) -
Federal Section of this Act to any other line item authorized in the
Community Assistance (CDBG) - Federal Section of this Act.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may operate
more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission authorizing broad powers under this Section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 34. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FLEXIBILITY RESTRICTIONS. The transfer flexibility provided to the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission within this Act relating to the appropriation
in the Community Assistance (CDBG) - Federal Section shall be used only when
necessary to carry out the Community Development Block Grant Program and
shall require approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
has determined that the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may operate
more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission authorizing broad powers under this Section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 35. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ADDITIONAL PAYMENTS AUTHORIZED. The Arkansas Industrial and Economic
Development Foundation is hereby authorized to make additional payments to
the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, from private
funding sources, and upon prior approval from the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission, the Arkansas Industrial and Economic Development
Foundation, and the Governor. Such additional payments to the Director of
the Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall not be considered salary
and shall not be deemed or construed to exceed the maximum salaries
established for unclassified employees by the General Assembly. Nothing in
this section may be construed to reduce or eliminate the authority granted
elsewhere in the Arkansas statute for the payment of allowances or bonuses to
unclassified employees.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 36. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD - INDUSTRY TRAINING PROGRAM. Any unexpended balance of funds
for the Industry Training Program in the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission Fund Account which remain at the close of each state fiscal year
shall be carried forward to the next state fiscal year to be used for the
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
same intent and purposes as set forth in law.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein,
may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD – TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT. The Division of Science and Technology of
the Arkansas Economic Development Commission is authorized to carry forward
an amount of up to $150,000 of any obligated but unexpended funds in the
Technology Development line item in the Division of Science and Technology -
State Operations Section of this Act for basic or applied research grants
which remains at the end of the fiscal year 2025 2026 to be used for the same
purpose.
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
APPROPRIATION AND FUND TRANSFERS. After receiving approval from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission is authorized to transfer appropriation and funds from
the Division of Science and Technology State Operations - Arkansas
Acceleration Fund Programs line item within the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission Fund Account to the Arkansas Acceleration Fund. The total of all
transfers shall not exceed $3,500,000.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish,
upon request from the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, a special
appropriation line item to be used in the acquisition of promotional items.
When the Arkansas Economic Development Commission wishes to transfer from its
operating expenses to promotional items, the request shall be forwarded to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for processing after prior approval by
the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may operate
more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission authorizing broad powers under this Section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this Section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this Section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 40. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. GRANT
AWARD CRITERIA. The Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission shall promulgate rules establishing the criteria to be
utilized in determining to whom grants will be made under this Act. Subject
to the approval of the Governor, and approval by the Arkansas Legislative
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
Council or the Joint Budget Committee, the Rural Services Division of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall distribute the grants.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is
provided to the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is
both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight
by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 41. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS. In the event that revenue is available for transfer to and in
support of the Arkansas Acceleration Fund Act, the Executive Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall certify to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State the amount needed for transfer from the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission Fund Account to the Arkansas Acceleration
Fund. Upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the amount
certified shall be transferred. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
initiate the necessary transfer documents to reflect all such transfers upon
the fiscal records of the State Auditor, the State Treasurer and the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37

SECTION 42. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
SERVICES.
(a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying account on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer
of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and
operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account Appropriation by the
Department of Commerce.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the
transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 43. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - MILITARY AFFAIRS GRANT PROGRAM. Any unexpended balance of funds
allocated for the Military Affairs Grant Program in the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission Fund Account which remain at the close of each state
fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next state fiscal year to be used
for the same intent and purposes as set forth in law. Any carry forward of
unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may be carried forward
under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 44. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - ARKANSAS ACCELERATION FUND PROGRAM. Any unexpended balance of
funds for the Arkansas Acceleration Fund Program line item in the Division of
Science and Technology - State Operations Section of this Act which remain at
the close of each state fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next
state fiscal year to be used for the same intent and purposes as set forth in
law.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reasons(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting,
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of the appropriation and a copy of the
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose, etc.
for which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty
(30) days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution
presents its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include all
information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 45. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 46. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 47. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB37
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

























04-03-2025 14:48:48 MAH011